Hawaii statutes.
§121-27 Dishonorable discharge, effect.
Any officer or enlisted member of the militia who is dishonorably dismissed or
discharged from the national guard, shall be disqualified from holding any
office or employment in the service of the State, or any county, unless
pardoned by the governor. [L 1967, c 196, pt of §1; HRS §121-27; am L 1969, c
15, §1(c)]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next